Florida, session 2026, HB481.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (11) of section 893.138, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
893.138 Local administrative action to abate certain
activities declared public nuisances.—
(11) The provisions of this section may be supplemented by
a county or municipal ordinance. The ordinance may include, but
is not limited to:
(a), provisions that establish additional Penalties for
public nuisances, including fines not to exceed $250 per day. If
the nuisance activity is not abated within 1 year, the fines
increase to $500 per day. In determining the amount of the fine,
if any, the nuisance abatement board shall consider the gravity
of the public nuisance and any actions taken by the owner to
correct the public nuisance.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 481 2026
(b); provide for the payment of reasonable costs, including
Reasonable attorney fees associated with investigations of and
hearings on public nuisances. If attorney fees are requested,
the nuisance abatement board shall award attorney fees after
considering, among other things, time and labor of any legal
assistants who contributed nonclerical, meaningful legal support
to the matter involved and who are working under the supervision
of an attorney. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "legal
assistant" means a person who, under the supervision and
direction of a licensed attorney, engages in legal research, and
case development or planning.
(c); provide for Continuing jurisdiction for a period of 1
year over any place or premises that has been or is declared to
be a public nuisance until the public nuisance is abated.
(d); establish penalties, including fines not to exceed
$500 per day for recurring public nuisances; provide for the
recording of orders on public nuisances so that notice must be
given to subsequent purchasers, successors in interest, or
assigns of the real property that is the subject of the order;
provide that recorded orders on public nuisances may become
liens against the real property that is the subject of the
order; and provide for the Foreclosure of property subject to a
lien and the recovery of all costs, including reasonable
attorney fees, associated with the recording of orders and
foreclosure. After 3 months from the filing of any such lien
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb481-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 481 2026
which remains unpaid, the nuisance abatement board may authorize
the appropriate entity to foreclose on the lien. If the nuisance
abatement activity is unabated after 2 years, the nuisance
abatement board shall authorize and require the appropriate
entity to foreclose on the lien. No lien created pursuant to the
provisions of this section may be foreclosed on real property
which is a homestead under s. 4, Art. X of the State
Constitution. Where a local government seeks to bring an
administrative action, based on a stolen property nuisance,
against a property owner operating an establishment where
multiple tenants, on one site, conduct their own retail
business, the property owner shall not be subject to a lien
against his or her property or the prohibition of operation
provision if the property owner evicts the business declared to
be a nuisance within 90 days after notification by registered
mail to the property owner of a second stolen property
conviction of the tenant. The total fines imposed pursuant to
the authority of this section shall not exceed $15,000. Nothing
contained within This section does not prohibit prohibits a
county or municipality from proceeding against a public nuisance
by any other means.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb481-01-c1